Washington statutes.
RCW 8.25.280

Valuation of public water systems.

Consistent with standard appraisal practices, the valuation of a public water system as defined in RCW 70A.125.010 shall reflect the cost of system improvements necessary to comply with health and safety rules of the state board of health and applicable regulations developed under chapter 43.20, 43.20A, or 70A.100 RCW.

[ 2021 c 65 s 9; 1990 c 133 s 9.]

NOTES:

Explanatory statement—2021 c 65: See note following RCW 53.54.030.

Findings—Severability—1990 c 133: See notes following RCW 36.94.140.